Hawaii statutes.
§449‑6
Application for license. (a)
Any corporation desiring to be licensed as an escrow depository shall submit an
application in writing and in a form prescribed by NMLS or by the
commissioner. The application shall be accompanied by a filing fee no part of
which shall be refundable.

(b) The application shall contain the
following:

(1) The corporate name, amount of capital, and office
address of the applicant;

(2) The names of the stockholders, officers, and
directors of the applicant;

(3) Evidence of the character, financial
responsibility, experience, and ability of the officers and directors;

(4) The names of the proposed escrow officers and
their qualifications;

(5) The history of the
applicant's material litigation and criminal convictions for the five-year
period prior to the date of the application;

(6) Information and authorizations necessary to
conduct a criminal history record check in accordance with section 846-2.7 of
each of the applicant's controlling persons, and each of the officers,
directors, and principals who will be in charge of the escrow depository's
activities upon licensure, accompanied by the appropriate payment of the
applicable fee for each record check; and

(7) Any other information the commissioner deems
necessary to participate in NMLS. [L 1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS §449-6; am L
1985, c 269, §50; am L 1992, c 205, §6; am L 2016, c 224, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next